Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2521
Personnel policy board; members; qualifications; appointment; term; removal; chairperson; meetings; quorum.

(1) The members of the personnel policy board shall be persons in sympathy with the application of merit principles to public employment and who are not otherwise employed by the county, except that the member employed by the county if serving on such board on May 6, 1987, shall continue to serve until the term of such member expires. No member shall hold during his or her term, or shall have held for a period of one year prior thereto, any political office or a position as officer or employee of a political organization.

(2) Two members of the board shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners, two members shall be appointed by the elected department heads, and two members shall be appointed by classified employees who are covered by the county personnel system.

(3) The first appointments made to the personnel policy board shall be for one, two, three, four, and five years. The board of county commissioners shall initially appoint members for terms of one and five years. The elected department heads shall initially appoint members for terms of two and four years. The classified employees who are covered by the county personnel system shall initially appoint a member for a term of three years. Within three months after May 6, 1987, the classified employees who are covered by the county personnel system shall initially appoint another member for a term of one year. Thereafter, each member shall be appointed in the same manner for a term of five years, except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of a term shall be appointed in the same manner for the remainder of the term. Each member of the board shall hold office until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.

(4) The board of county commissioners and elected department heads may remove any member of the personnel policy board for neglect of duty or misconduct in office after first giving him or her a copy of the reasons for removal and providing for the member to be heard publicly before the commissioners and elected department heads. A copy of the charges and a transcript of the record of the hearing shall be filed with the county clerk.

(5) The personnel policy board shall elect a chairperson from among its members. The board shall meet at such time and place as shall be specified by call of the chairperson or the county personnel officer. At least one meeting shall be held quarterly. Four members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. Board members shall serve without compensation.

Laws 1974, LB 995, § 5;

Laws 1987, LB 198, § 2.